Connecticut, session 2026, HB05118.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
two million seven hundred seventy thousand seventy-five dollars, the
proceeds of which shall be used by the Department of Economic and
Community Development for the purpose of providing a grant-in-aid
to Catholic Charities, Inc., to repair and renovate the building and
grounds at 652 Willard Avenue in the town of Newington.